Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska74-1304
Board of directors; members; appointment; expenses.

(1) If a district is formed which includes only one city, such district shall be governed by a board of directors made up of three members from the city council of such city adopting such resolution, which members shall be designated by such council, and of three members from the county commissioners of such county adopting such resolution, which members shall be designated by the county board.

(2) If a district is formed which has two or more cities of the primary or first class, such district shall be governed by a board of directors made up of three members from each city council adopting such resolution, which members shall be designated by such council, and of three members from the county commissioners of such county adopting such resolution which members shall be designated by the county board. When participating in the district's affairs, the members representing the cities shall each have one vote and the members representing the county shall each have one vote for each city represented, so that the total number of votes of members of the cities is equal to the total number of votes of members of the county.

(3) In each instance such designated individual shall be an elected member of such body. No additional compensation shall be paid to such directors, but such directors shall be paid their actual expenses while engaged in the business of the district. Such directors shall be appointed annually by the respective bodies, or when a vacancy shall earlier occur.

Laws 1971, LB 919, § 4;

Laws 1981, LB 65, § 3.